Utah statutes.
26-46-101.   Definitions.

(1)  "Geriatric professional" means a person who:

(a)  is a licensed:

(i)  health care professional;

(ii)  social worker;

(iii)  occupational therapist;

(iv)  pharmacist;

(v)  physical therapist; or

(vi)  psychologist; and

(b)  is determined by the department to have adequate advanced training in geriatrics to prepare the person to provide specialized geriatric care within the scope of the person's profession.

(2)  "Health care professional" means:

(a)  a licensed:

(i)  physician;

(ii)  physician assistant;

(iii)  nurse;

(iv)  dentist; or

(v)  mental health therapist; or

(b)  another licensed health care professional designated by the department by rule.

(3)  "Underserved area" means an area designated by the department as underserved by health care professionals, based upon the results of a needs assessment developed by the department in consultation with the Utah Health Care Workforce Financial Assistance Program Advisory Committee created under Section 26-46-103.

